Utah statutes.
63M-1-2806.   Report to the Legislature.
The office shall report annually to the Legislature's Workforce Services and
Community and Economic Development Interim Committee and the Utah Tax Review
Commission describing:
(1)  its success in attracting renewable energy projects to renewable energy
development zones under this part and the corresponding increase in new
increment jobs;
(2)  the amount of tax credits promised and the period of time over which the
tax credits will be paid; and
(3)  the economic impact on the state related to generating new state revenues
and providing tax credits under this part.
